Florida, session 2026, HB757.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
61
62 Section 1. Paragraph (k) of subsection (1) of section
63 30.15, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
64 30.15 Powers, duties, and obligations.—
65 (1) Sheriffs, in their respective counties, in person or
66 by deputy, shall:
67 (k) Assist district school boards and charter school
68 governing boards in complying with, or private schools or child
69 care facilities, as defined in s. 402.302, in exercising options
70 in, s. 1006.12. A sheriff must also assist public postsecondary
71 educational institutions, as described in s. 1000.04(3), in
72 implementing a guardian program under s. 1006.601. A sheriff
73 shall, at a minimum, provide access to a Chris Hixon, Coach
74 Aaron Feis, and Coach Scott Beigel Guardian Program to aid in
75 the prevention or abatement of active assailant incidents on
Page 3 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
76 school premises, as required under this paragraph. Persons
77 certified as school guardians pursuant to this paragraph have no
78 authority to act in any law enforcement capacity except to the
79 extent necessary to prevent or abate an active assailant
80 incident.
81 1.a. If a local school board has voted by a majority to
82 implement a guardian program or has contracted for the use of
83 school security guards to satisfy the requirements of s.
84 1006.12, the sheriff in that county must establish a guardian
85 program to provide training for school guardians or school
86 security guards, pursuant to subparagraph 2., to meet the demand
87 for the training of school district, charter school, public
88 postsecondary educational institution, private school, child
89 care facility, or security agency employees, either directly or
90 through a contract with other another sheriff's offices office
91 that have has established a guardian program. The security
92 agency employing a school security guard is responsible for all
93 training and screening-related costs for a school security
94 guard, but such charges may not exceed the actual cost incurred
95 by the sheriff to provide the training.
96 b. Upon the request of a private school, child care
97 facility, public postsecondary educational institution, or A
98 charter school governing board in a school district that has not
99 implemented voted, or has declined, to implement a guardian
100 program, may request the sheriff in the county must to establish
Page 4 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
101 a guardian training program or contract with other sheriff's
102 offices that have established a guardian training program to
103 meet demand for the purpose of training of the private school,
104 child care facility, public postsecondary educational
105 institution, or charter school employees or school security
106 guards consistent with the requirements of subparagraph 2. If
107 the county sheriff denies the request, the charter school
108 governing board may contract with a sheriff that has established
109 a guardian program to provide such training. The charter school
110 governing board must notify the superintendent and the sheriff
111 in the charter school's county of the contract prior to its
112 execution. The security agency employing a school security guard
113 is responsible for all training and screening-related costs for
114 a school security guard, but such charges may not exceed the
115 actual cost incurred by the sheriff to provide the training.
116 c. A private school or child care facility in a school
117 district that has not voted, or has declined, to implement a
118 guardian program may request that the sheriff in the county of
119 the private school or child care facility establish a guardian
120 program for the purpose of training private school employees,
121 child care facility employees, or school security guards. If the
122 county sheriff denies the request, the private school or child
123 care facility may contract with a sheriff from another county
124 who has established a guardian program under subparagraph 2. to
125 provide such training. The private school or child care facility
Page 5 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
126 must notify the sheriff in the private school's or child care
127 facility's county of the contract with a sheriff from another
128 county before its execution. The private school, child care
129 facility, or security agency is responsible for all training and
130 screening-related costs for a school guardian program. The
131 sheriff providing such training must ensure that any moneys paid
132 by a private school, child care facility, or security agency are
133 not commingled with any funds provided by the state to the
134 sheriff as reimbursement for screening-related and training-
135 related costs of any school district or charter school employee.
136 c.d. The training program required in sub-subparagraph
137 2.b. is a standardized statewide curriculum, and each sheriff
138 providing such training shall adhere to the course of
139 instruction specified in that sub-subparagraph. The costs for
140 the training program shall be consistent with guidelines
141 established by the Florida Sheriffs Association. This
142 subparagraph does not prohibit a sheriff from providing
143 additional training. Any additional training shall be provided
144 at no cost to a private school, child care facility, or security
145 agency. A school guardian or school security guard who has
146 completed the training program required in sub-subparagraph 2.b.
147 may not be required to attend another sheriff's training program
148 pursuant to that sub-subparagraph unless there has been at least
149 a 1-year break in his or her appointment as a guardian or
150 employment by a security agency as a school security guard in a
Page 6 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
151 school.
152 d.e. The sheriff conducting the training pursuant to
153 subparagraph 2. for school district, and charter school, or
154 public postsecondary educational institution employees will be
155 reimbursed for screening-related and training-related costs and
156 for providing a one-time stipend of $500 to each school guardian
157 who participates in the school guardian program.
158 e.f. The sheriff may waive the training and screening-
159 related costs for a private school or child care facility for a
160 school guardian training program. Funds provided pursuant to
161 sub-subparagraph e. may not be used to subsidize any costs that
162 have been waived by the sheriff. The sheriff may not waive the
163 training and screening-related costs required to be paid by a
164 security agency for initial training or ongoing training of a
165 school security guard.
166 f.g. A person who is certified and in good standing under
167 the Florida Criminal Justice Standards and Training Commission,
168 who meets the qualifications established in s. 943.13, and who
169 is otherwise qualified for the position of a school guardian or
170 school security guard may be certified as a school guardian or
171 school security guard by the sheriff without completing the
172 training requirements of sub-subparagraph 2.b. However, a person
173 certified as a school guardian or school security guard under
174 this sub-subparagraph must meet the requirements of sub-
175 subparagraphs 2.c.-e.
Page 7 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
176 2. A sheriff who establishes a program shall consult with
177 the Department of Law Enforcement on programmatic guiding
178 principles, practices, and resources, and shall certify as
179 school guardians, without the power of arrest, school employees,
180 as specified in s. 1006.12(3), or shall certify as school
181 security guards those persons employed by a security agency who
182 meet the criteria specified in s. 1006.12(4), and who:
183 a. Hold a valid license issued under s. 790.06 or are
184 otherwise eligible to possess or carry a concealed firearm under
185 chapter 790.
186 b. After satisfying the requirements of s. 1006.12(7),
187 complete a 144-hour training program, consisting of 12 hours of
188 training to improve the school guardian's knowledge and skills
189 necessary to respond to and de-escalate incidents on school
190 premises and 132 total hours of comprehensive firearm safety and
191 proficiency training conducted by Criminal Justice Standards and
192 Training Commission-certified instructors, which must include:
193 (I) Eighty hours of firearms instruction based on the
194 Criminal Justice Standards and Training Commission's Law
195 Enforcement Academy training model, which must include at least
196 10 percent but no more than 20 percent more rounds fired than
197 associated with academy training. Program participants must
198 achieve an 85 percent pass rate on the firearms training.
199 (II) Sixteen hours of instruction in precision pistol.
200 (III) Eight hours of discretionary shooting instruction
Page 8 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
201 using state-of-the-art simulator exercises.
202 (IV) Sixteen hours of instruction in active shooter or
203 assailant scenarios.
204 (V) Eight hours of instruction in defensive tactics.
205 (VI) Four hours of instruction in legal issues.
206 c. Pass a psychological evaluation administered by a
207 psychologist licensed under chapter 490 and designated by the
208 Department of Law Enforcement and submit the results of the
209 evaluation to the sheriff's office. The Department of Law
210 Enforcement is authorized to provide the sheriff's office with
211 mental health and substance abuse data for compliance with this
212 paragraph.
213 d. Submit to and pass an initial drug test and subsequent
214 random drug tests in accordance with the requirements of s.
215 112.0455 and the sheriff's office.
216 e. Successfully complete ongoing training, weapon
217 inspection, and firearm qualification on at least an annual
218 basis.
219
220 The sheriff who conducts the guardian training or waives the
221 training requirements for a person under sub-subparagraph 1.g.
222 shall issue a school guardian certificate to persons who meet
223 the requirements of this section to the satisfaction of the
224 sheriff, and shall maintain documentation of weapon and
225 equipment inspections, as well as the training, certification,
Page 9 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
226 inspection, and qualification records of each school guardian
227 certified by the sheriff. A person who is certified under this
228 paragraph may serve as a school guardian under s. 1006.12(3)
229 only if he or she is appointed by the applicable school district
230 superintendent, charter school principal, public postsecondary
231 educational institution president, private school head of
232 school, or child care facility owner. A sheriff who conducts the
233 training for a school security guard or waives the training
234 requirements for a person under sub-subparagraph 1.g. and
235 determines that the school security guard has met all the
236 requirements of s. 1006.12(4) shall issue a school security
237 guard certificate to persons who meet the requirements of this
238 section to the satisfaction of the sheriff and shall maintain
239 documentation of weapon and equipment inspections, training,
240 certification, and qualification records for each school
241 security guard certified by the sheriff.
242 3.a. Within 30 days after issuing a school guardian or
243 school security guard certificate, the sheriff who issued the
244 certificate must report to the Department of Law Enforcement the
245 name, date of birth, and certification date of the school
246 guardian or school security guard.
247 b. By February 1 and September 1 of each school year, each
248 school district, charter school, employing security agency,
249 public postsecondary educational institution, private school,
250 and child care facility must report in the manner prescribed to
Page 10 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
251 the Department of Law Enforcement the name, date of birth, and
252 appointment date of each person appointed as a school guardian
253 or employed as a school security guard. The school district,
254 charter school, employing security agency, public postsecondary
255 educational institution, private school, and child care facility
256 must also report in the manner prescribed to the Department of
257 Law Enforcement the date each school guardian or school security
258 guard separates from his or her appointment as a school guardian
259 or employment as a school security guard in a school.
260 c. The Department of Law Enforcement shall maintain a list
261 of each person appointed as a school guardian or certified as a
262 school security guard in the state. The list must include the
263 name and certification date of each school guardian and school
264 security guard and the date the person was appointed as a school
265 guardian or certified as a school security guard, including the
266 name of the school district, charter school, public
267 postsecondary educational institution, private school, or child
268 care facility in which the school guardian is appointed, or the
269 employing security agency of a school security guard, any
270 information provided pursuant to s. 1006.12(5), and, if
271 applicable, the date such person separated from his or her
272 appointment as a school guardian or the last date a school
273 security guard served in a school as of the last reporting date.
274 The Department of Law Enforcement shall remove from the list any
275 person whose training has expired pursuant to sub-subparagraph
Page 11 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
276 1.d.
277 d. Each sheriff shall report on a quarterly basis to the
278 Department of Law Enforcement the schedule for upcoming school
279 guardian trainings, to include guardian trainings for school
280 security guards, including the dates of the training, the
281 training locations, a contact person to register for the
282 training, and the class capacity. If no trainings are scheduled,
283 the sheriff is not required to report to the Department of Law
284 Enforcement. The Department of Law Enforcement shall publish on
285 its website a list of the upcoming school guardian trainings.
286 The Department of Law Enforcement shall update such list
287 quarterly.
288 e. A sheriff who fails to report the information required
289 by this subparagraph may not receive reimbursement from the
290 Department of Education for school guardian trainings. Upon the
291 submission of the required information, a sheriff is deemed
292 eligible for such funding and is authorized to continue to
293 receive reimbursement for school guardian training.
294 f. A school district, charter school, public postsecondary
295 educational institution, private school, child care facility, or
296 employing security agency that fails to report the information
297 required by this subparagraph is prohibited from operating a
298 school guardian program or employing school security guards in
299 the following school year unless the missing information is
300 provided.
Page 12 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
301 g. By March 1 and October 1 of each school year, the
302 Department of Law Enforcement shall notify the Department of
303 Education of any sheriff, school district, charter school,
304 public postsecondary educational institution, private school, or
305 child care facility that has not complied with the reporting
306 requirements of this subparagraph.
307 h. The Department of Law Enforcement may adopt rules to
308 implement the requirements of this subparagraph, including
309 requiring additional reporting information only as necessary to
310 uniquely identify each school guardian and school security guard
311 reported.
312 Section 2. Effective October 1, 2026, paragraph (d) of
313 subsection (2) of section 790.115, Florida Statutes, is amended,
314 and subsection (4) is added to that section, to read:
315 790.115 Possessing or discharging weapons or firearms at a
316 school-sponsored event or on school property prohibited;
317 penalties; exceptions.—
318 (2)
319 (d) A person commits a felony of the second degree,
320 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084,
321 if he or she: who
322 1. Discharges any weapon or firearm while in violation of
323 paragraph (a), unless discharged for lawful defense of himself
324 or herself or another or for a lawful purpose; or,
325 2. Discharges any weapon or firearm within 1,000 feet of a
Page 13 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
326 school, during school hours or during the time of a sanctioned
327 school activity, unless discharged for lawful defense of himself
328 or herself or another or for a lawful purpose. This subparagraph
329 does not apply to the discharge of a weapon or firearm on
330 private real property within 1,000 feet of a school by the owner
331 of such property or by a person whose presence on such property
332 has been authorized, licensed, or invited by the owner commits a
333 felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in s.
334 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
335 (4) A person arrested for a violation of paragraph (2)(d)
336 must be held in custody until brought before the court for
337 admittance to bail in accordance with chapter 903.
338 Section 3. Effective October 1, 2026, paragraph (f) of
339 subsection (3) of section 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended
340 to read:
341 921.0022 Criminal Punishment Code; offense severity
342 ranking chart.—
343 (3) OFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART
344 (f) LEVEL 6
345
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
346
316.027(2)(b) 2nd Leaving the scene of a crash
involving serious bodily
Page 14 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
injury.
347
316.193(2)(b) 3rd Felony DUI, 4th or subsequent
conviction.
348
316.1935(4)(a) 2nd Aggravated fleeing or eluding.
349
327.30(5)(a)3. 2nd Vessel accidents involving
serious bodily injury; leaving
scene.
350
400.9935(4)(c) 2nd Operating a clinic, or offering
services requiring licensure,
without a license.
351
499.0051(2) 2nd Knowing forgery of transaction
history, transaction
information, or transaction
statement.
352
499.0051(3) 2nd Knowing purchase or receipt of
prescription drug from
unauthorized person.
353
499.0051(4) 2nd Knowing sale or transfer of
Page 15 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
prescription drug to
unauthorized person.
354
775.0875(1) 3rd Taking firearm from law
enforcement officer.
355
784.021(1)(a) 3rd Aggravated assault; deadly
weapon without intent to kill.
356
784.021(1)(b) 3rd Aggravated assault; intent to
commit felony.
357
784.041 3rd Felony battery; domestic
battery by strangulation.
358
784.048(3) 3rd Aggravated stalking; credible
threat.
359
784.048(5) 3rd Aggravated stalking of person
under 16.
360
784.07(2)(c) 2nd Aggravated assault on law
enforcement officer.
361
784.074(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on sexually
Page 16 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
violent predators facility
staff.
362
784.08(2)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on a person
65 years of age or older.
363
784.081(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on specified
official or employee.
364
784.082(2) 2nd Aggravated assault by detained
person on visitor or other
detainee.
365
784.083(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on code
inspector.
366
787.02(2) 3rd False imprisonment; restraining
with purpose other than those
in s. 787.01.
367
787.025(2)(a) 3rd Luring or enticing a child.
368
790.115(2)(d) 2nd Discharging firearm or weapon
on school property or within
1,000 feet of a school.
Page 17 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
369
790.161(2) 2nd Make, possess, or throw
destructive device with intent
to do bodily harm or damage
property.
370
790.164(1) 2nd False report concerning bomb,
explosive, weapon of mass
destruction, act of arson or
violence to state property, or
use of firearms in violent
manner.
371
790.19 2nd Shooting or throwing deadly
missiles into dwellings,
vessels, or vehicles.
372
794.011(8)(a) 3rd Solicitation of minor to
participate in sexual activity
by custodial adult.
373
794.05(1) 2nd Unlawful sexual activity with
specified minor.
374
800.04(5)(d) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
Page 18 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
victim 12 years of age or older
but less than 16 years of age;
offender less than 18 years.
375
800.04(6)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious conduct;
offender 18 years of age or
older.
376
806.031(2) 2nd Arson resulting in great bodily
harm to firefighter or any
other person.
377
810.02(3)(c) 2nd Burglary of occupied structure;
unarmed; no assault or battery.
378
810.145(8)(b) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain
minor victims; 2nd or
subsequent offense.
379
812.014(2)(b)1. 2nd Property stolen $20,000 or
more, but less than $100,000,
grand theft in 2nd degree.
380
812.014(2)(c)5. 3rd Grand theft; third degree;
firearm.
Page 19 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
381
812.014(6) 2nd Theft; property stolen $3,000
or more; coordination of
others.
382
812.015(9)(a) 2nd Retail theft; property stolen
$750 or more; second or
subsequent conviction.
383
812.015(9)(b) 2nd Retail theft; aggregated
property stolen within 120 days
is $3,000 or more; coordination
of others.
384
812.015(9)(d) 2nd Retail theft; multiple thefts
within specified period.
385
812.015(9)(e) 2nd Retail theft; committed with
specified number of other
persons and use of social media
platform.
386
812.13(2)(c) 2nd Robbery, no firearm or other
weapon (strong-arm robbery).
387
Page 20 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
817.4821(5) 2nd Possess cloning paraphernalia
with intent to create cloned
cellular telephones.
388
817.49(2)(b)2. 2nd Willful making of a false
report of a crime resulting in
death.
389
817.505(4)(b) 2nd Patient brokering; 10 or more
patients.
390
817.5695(3)(b) 2nd Exploitation of person 65 years
of age or older, value $10,000
or more, but less than $50,000.
391
825.102(1) 3rd Abuse of an elderly person or
disabled adult.
392
825.102(3)(c) 3rd Neglect of an elderly person or
disabled adult.
393
825.1025(3) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation
of an elderly person or
disabled adult.
394
Page 21 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
825.103(3)(c) 3rd Exploiting an elderly person or
disabled adult and property is
valued at less than $10,000.
395
827.03(2)(c) 3rd Abuse of a child.
396
827.03(2)(d) 3rd Neglect of a child.
397
827.071(5) 3rd Possess, control, or
intentionally view any
photographic material, motion
picture, etc., which includes
child pornography.
398
828.126(3) 3rd Sexual activities involving
animals.
399
836.05 2nd Threats; extortion.
400
836.10 2nd Written or electronic threats
to kill, do bodily injury, or
conduct a mass shooting or an
act of terrorism.
401
843.12 3rd Aids or assists person to
Page 22 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
escape.
402
847.011 3rd Distributing, offering to
distribute, or possessing with
intent to distribute obscene
materials depicting minors.
403
847.012 3rd Knowingly using a minor in the
production of materials harmful
to minors.
404
847.0135(2) 3rd Facilitates sexual conduct of
or with a minor or the visual
depiction of such conduct.
405
893.131 2nd Distribution of controlled
substances resulting in
overdose or serious bodily
injury.
406
914.23 2nd Retaliation against a witness,
victim, or informant, with
bodily injury.
407
918.13(2)(b) 2nd Tampering with or fabricating
Page 23 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
physical evidence relating to a
capital felony.
408
944.35(3)(a)2. 3rd Committing malicious battery
upon or inflicting cruel or
inhuman treatment on an inmate
or offender on community
supervision, resulting in great
bodily harm.
409
944.40 2nd Escapes.
410
944.46 3rd Harboring, concealing, aiding
escaped prisoners.
411
944.47(1)(a)5. 2nd Introduction of contraband
(firearm, weapon, or explosive)
into correctional facility.
412
951.22(1)(i) 3rd Firearm or weapon introduced
into county detention facility.
413
414 Section 4. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section
415 943.082, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (c) is
416 added to that subsection, to read:
Page 24 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
417 943.082 School Safety Awareness Program.—
418 (4)(a) Law enforcement dispatch centers, school districts,
419 schools, postsecondary institutions, and other entities
420 identified by the department must be made aware of the mobile
421 suspicious activity reporting tool.
422 (c) Each public postsecondary educational institution, as
423 defined in s. 1000.04(3), that does not have an existing public
424 safety reporting application as of July 1, 2026, shall promote
425 the use of the mobile suspicious activity reporting tool by
426 advertising it on the institution website, by installing it on
427 all mobile devices issued by the institution, and by bookmarking
428 the website on all computer devices maintained by the
429 institution.
430 Section 5. Subsection (4) is added to section 1003.25,
431 Florida Statutes, and subsection (2) of that section is
432 republished, to read:
433 1003.25 Procedures for maintenance and transfer of student
434 records.—
435 (2) The procedure for transferring and maintaining records
436 of students who transfer from school to school is prescribed by
437 rules of the State Board of Education. The transfer of records
438 must occur within 5 school days. The records must include, if
439 applicable:
440 (a) Verified reports of serious or recurrent behavior
441 patterns, including any threat assessment report, all
Page 25 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
442 corresponding documentation, and any other information required
443 by the Florida-specific behavioral threat assessment instrument
444 pursuant to s. 1001.212(11) which contains the evaluation,
445 intervention, and management of the threat assessment
446 evaluations and intervention services.
447 (b) Psychological evaluations, including therapeutic
448 treatment plans and therapy or progress notes created or
449 maintained by school district or charter school staff, as
450 appropriate.
451 (4) When the education records of a student contain the
452 documents described in subsection (2) and the student enrolls in
453 a Florida College System institution or state university, such
454 records must be transferred to his or her institution or
455 university of enrollment. The State Board of Education and the
456 Board of Governors shall adopt rules and regulations,
457 respectively, to establish the procedures for the transfer of a
458 student's threat assessment report pursuant to this subsection.
459 Section 6. Paragraph (a) of subsection (6) and paragraph
460 (g) of subsection (7) of section 1006.07, Florida Statutes, are
461 amended to read:
462 1006.07 District school board duties relating to student
463 discipline and school safety.—The district school board shall
464 provide for the proper accounting for all students, for the
465 attendance and control of students at school, and for proper
466 attention to health, safety, and other matters relating to the
Page 26 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
467 welfare of students, including:
468 (6) SAFETY AND SECURITY BEST PRACTICES.—Each district
469 school superintendent shall establish policies and procedures
470 for the prevention of violence on school grounds, including the
471 assessment of and intervention with individuals whose behavior
472 poses a threat to the safety of the school community.
473 (a) School safety specialist.—Each district school
474 superintendent shall designate a school safety specialist for
475 the district. The school safety specialist must be a school
476 administrator employed by the school district or a law
477 enforcement officer employed by the sheriff's office located in
478 the school district. Any school safety specialist designated
479 from the sheriff's office must first be authorized and approved
480 by the sheriff employing the law enforcement officer. Any school
481 safety specialist designated from the sheriff's office remains
482 the employee of the office for purposes of compensation,
483 insurance, workers' compensation, and other benefits authorized
484 by law for a law enforcement officer employed by the sheriff's
485 office. The sheriff and the school superintendent may determine
486 by agreement the reimbursement for such costs, or may share the
487 costs, associated with employment of the law enforcement officer
488 as a school safety specialist. The school safety specialist must
489 earn a certificate of completion of the school safety specialist
490 training provided by the Office of Safe Schools within 1 year
491 after appointment and is responsible for the supervision and
Page 27 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
492 oversight for all school safety and security personnel,
493 policies, and procedures in the school district. The school
494 safety specialist, or his or her designee, shall:
495 1. In conjunction with the district school superintendent,
496 annually review school district policies and procedures for
497 compliance with state law and rules, including the district's
498 timely and accurate submission of school environmental safety
499 incident reports to the department pursuant to s. 1001.212(8).
500 At least quarterly, the school safety specialist must report to
501 the district school superintendent and the district school board
502 any noncompliance by the school district with laws or rules
503 regarding school safety.
504 2. Provide the necessary training and resources to
505 students and school district staff in matters relating to youth
506 mental health awareness and assistance; emergency procedures,
507 including active shooter training; and school safety and
508 security. Such training for classroom teachers and other members
509 of instructional staff must explain the purpose, importance, and
510 proper execution of school safety protocols and emergency
511 procedures.
512 3. Serve as the school district liaison with local public
513 safety agencies and national, state, and community agencies and
514 organizations in matters of school safety and security.
515 4. In collaboration with the appropriate public safety
516 agencies, as that term is defined in s. 365.171, by October 1 of
Page 28 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
517 each year, conduct a school security risk assessment at each
518 public school using the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool
519 developed by the Office of Safe Schools pursuant to s.
520 1006.1493. Based on the assessment findings, the district's
521 school safety specialist shall provide recommendations to the
522 district school superintendent and the district school board
523 which identify strategies and activities that the district
524 school board should implement in order to address the findings
525 and improve school safety and security. Each district school
526 board must receive such findings and the school safety
527 specialist's recommendations at a publicly noticed district
528 school board meeting to provide the public an opportunity to
529 hear the district school board members discuss and take action
530 on the findings and recommendations. Each school safety
531 specialist, through the district school superintendent, shall
532 report such findings and school board action to the Office of
533 Safe Schools within 30 days after the district school board
534 meeting.
535 5. Conduct annual unannounced inspections, using the form
536 adopted by the Office of Safe Schools pursuant to s.
537 1001.212(13), of all public schools, including charter schools,
538 while school is in session and investigate reports of
539 noncompliance with school safety requirements.
540 6. Report violations of paragraph (f) by administrative
541 personnel and instructional personnel to the district school
Page 29 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
542 superintendent or charter school administrator, as applicable.
543 (7) THREAT MANAGEMENT TEAMS.—Each district school board
544 and charter school governing board shall establish a threat
545 management team at each school whose duties include the
546 coordination of resources and assessment and intervention with
547 students whose behavior may pose a threat to the safety of the
548 school, school staff, or students.
549 (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all state
550 and local agencies and programs that provide services to
551 students experiencing or at risk of an emotional disturbance or
552 a mental illness, including the school districts, charter
553 schools, school personnel, state universities, Florida College
554 System institutions, state and local law enforcement agencies,
555 the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Department of Children
556 and Families, the Department of Health, the Agency for Health
557 Care Administration, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities,
558 the Department of Education, the Statewide Guardian ad Litem
559 Office, and any service or support provider contracting with
560 such agencies, may share with each other records or information
561 that are confidential or exempt from disclosure under chapter
562 119 if the records or information are reasonably necessary to
563 ensure access to appropriate services for the student or to
564 ensure the safety of the student or others. All such state and
565 local agencies and programs shall communicate, collaborate, and
566 coordinate efforts to serve such students.
Page 30 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
567 Section 7. Section 1006.601, Florida Statutes, is created
568 to read:
569 1006.601 Active Response and Mitigation of On-Campus Risks
570 (ARMOR) Act.—
571 (1) SHORT TITLE.—This section may be cited as the "Active
572 Response and Mitigation of On-Campus Risks (ARMOR) Act."
573 (2) DEFINITION.—As used in this section, the term "public
574 postsecondary educational institution" has the same meaning as
575 in s. 1000.04(3).
576 (3) SCHOOL GUARDIANS.—
577 (a) Public postsecondary educational institutions are
578 authorized to participate in the Chris Hixon, Coach Aaron Feis,
579 and Coach Scott Beigel Guardian Program and may appoint
580 certified school guardians pursuant to s. 30.15(1)(k).
581 (b) An employee or faculty member, who is not a student,
582 of a public postsecondary educational institution may serve as a
583 school guardian, in support of school-sanctioned activities for
584 purposes of s. 790.115, upon satisfactory completion of the
585 requirements under s. 30.15(1)(k) and certification by a
586 sheriff.
587 (4) SAFETY AND SECURITY BEST PRACTICES.—
588 (a) Response plans.—Each public postsecondary educational
589 institution shall:
590 1. Adopt an active assailant response plan, which shall
591 include methods for issuing emergency notifications pursuant to
Page 31 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
592 20 U.S.C. s. 1092(f), and annually certify that all faculty,
593 staff, and students have completed active assailant preparedness
594 training. The plan must clearly identify all personnel who may
595 issue such emergency notifications.
596 2. Adopt, in cooperation with local law enforcement
597 agencies and local government, a family reunification plan to
598 reunite students and employees with their families in the event
599 that an institution is closed or unexpectedly evacuated due to a
600 natural or manmade disaster. This reunification plan must be
601 reviewed annually and updated as necessary.
602 (b) Student mental health.—Each public postsecondary
603 educational institution shall:
604 1. Train faculty to detect and respond to mental health
605 issues as well as connect students who may experience behavioral
606 health issues with appropriate services, both on campus and in
607 the community, including crisis intervention.
608 2. Post on its website and in conspicuous locations at
609 each institution a mental health awareness and suicide
610 prevention sign that identifies ways a person can access help
611 and services. Physical signs must be at least 11 inches by 15
612 inches in size and must be printed in an easily legible font and
613 in at least 32-point type.
614 3. Establish threat management teams whose duties include
615 the coordination of resources and assessment and intervention
616 with students whose behavior may pose a threat to the safety of
Page 32 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
617 the institution, institution staff, or students. The threat
618 management team must use the statewide behavioral threat
619 management operational process and Florida-specific behavioral
620 threat assessment instrument developed by the Office of Safe
621 Schools pursuant to s. 1001.212(11) or another comparable tool
622 deemed appropriate for postsecondary institutions by the State
623 Board of Education and Board of Governors.
624
625 The Commissioner of Education and the Chancellor of the State
626 University System shall provide guidance on when and how
627 administrators, mental health providers, and other appropriate
628 personnel are legally entitled to share and receive information
629 about individuals who may be a threat to themselves or others,
630 including, but not limited to, the transmission of education
631 records pursuant to s. 1003.25(4).
632 (c) Security risk assessment.—Each public postsecondary
633 educational institution, in collaboration with appropriate
634 public safety agencies, as defined in s. 365.171(3)(d), shall
635 annually conduct a security risk assessment at each campus using
636 the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool developed by the Office
637 of Safe Schools pursuant to s. 1006.1493 or another comparable
638 tool deemed appropriate for postsecondary institutions by the
639 State Board of Education and Board of Governors. Subject to an
640 appropriation, the institution may apply for grant funds for
641 security improvements to its campus based on findings in the
Page 33 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
642 security risk assessment.
643 (d) Student, faculty, and staff supports.—Each public
644 postsecondary educational institution must adopt policies and
645 procedures to support students, faculty, and staff who are the
646 victims of an incident constituting an act of violence or an
647 attempted act of violence or who are subjected to a credible
648 threat as defined in s. 784.048(1)(c). The policies shall:
649 1. Outline the supports available to affected persons,
650 which may include work or class relocation, security escorts,
651 and restricting access to certain areas by individuals who
652 created the incident.
653 2. Provide for timely updates to an affected person
654 regarding any action taken by the institution in response to the
655 incident.
656 (5) RULES AND REGULATIONS.—The State Board of Education
657 and the Board of Governors may adopt rules and regulations,
658 respectively, to implement this section.
659 Section 8. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
660 made by this act to section 30.15, Florida Statutes, in a
661 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (19) of section
662 402.305, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
663 402.305 Licensing standards; child care facilities.—
664 (19) SAFE-SCHOOL OFFICERS.—
665 (a) A child care facility may partner with a law
666 enforcement agency or a security agency to establish or assign
Page 34 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
667 one or more safe-school officers established in s. 1006.12(1)-
668 (4). The child care facility is responsible for the full cost of
669 implementing any such option, which includes all training costs
670 under the Chris Hixon, Coach Aaron Feis, and Coach Scott Beigel
671 Guardian Program under s. 30.15(1)(k).
672 Section 9. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
673 made by this act to section 30.15, Florida Statutes, in a
674 reference thereto, section 843.08, Florida Statutes, is
675 reenacted to read:
676 843.08 False personation.—A person who falsely assumes or
677 pretends to be a firefighter, a sheriff, an officer of the
678 Florida Highway Patrol, an officer of the Fish and Wildlife
679 Conservation Commission, an officer of the Department of
680 Environmental Protection, an officer of the Department of
681 Financial Services, any personnel or representative of the
682 Division of Criminal Investigations, an officer of the
683 Department of Corrections, a correctional probation officer, a
684 deputy sheriff, a state attorney or an assistant state attorney,
685 a statewide prosecutor or an assistant statewide prosecutor, a
686 state attorney investigator, a coroner, a police officer, a
687 lottery special agent or lottery investigator, a beverage
688 enforcement agent, a school guardian as described in s.
689 30.15(1)(k), a security officer licensed under chapter 493, any
690 member of the Florida Commission on Offender Review or any
691 administrative aide or supervisor employed by the commission,
Page 35 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
692 any personnel or representative of the Department of Law
693 Enforcement, or a federal law enforcement officer as defined in
694 s. 901.1505, and takes upon himself or herself to act as such,
695 or to require any other person to aid or assist him or her in a
696 matter pertaining to the duty of any such officer, commits a
697 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s.
698 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. However, a person who
699 falsely personates any such officer during the course of the
700 commission of a felony commits a felony of the second degree,
701 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
702 If the commission of the felony results in the death or personal
703 injury of another human being, the person commits a felony of
704 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.
705 775.083, or s. 775.084. In determining whether a defendant has
706 violated this section, the court or jury may consider any
707 relevant evidence, including, but not limited to, whether the
708 defendant used lights in violation of s. 316.2397 or s. 843.081.
709 Section 10. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
710 made by this act to section 30.15, Florida Statutes, in a
711 reference thereto, subsection (16) of section 943.03, Florida
712 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
713 943.03 Department of Law Enforcement.—
714 (16) Upon request, the department shall consult with
715 sheriffs to provide input regarding programmatic guiding
716 principles, practices, and resources in order to assist in the
Page 36 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
717 development and implementation of the Chris Hixon, Coach Aaron
718 Feis, and Coach Scott Beigel Guardian Program established
719 pursuant to s. 30.15. Such input and guidance may include, but
720 need not be limited to, standards, curriculum, instructional
721 strategies, evaluation, certification, records retention,
722 equipment, and other resource needs.
723 Section 11. For the purpose of incorporating the
724 amendments made by this act to sections 943.082 and 1006.07,
725 Florida Statutes, in references thereto, subsections (1), (4),
726 and (10) of section 1001.212, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to
727 read:
728 1001.212 Office of Safe Schools.—There is created in the
729 Department of Education the Office of Safe Schools. The office
730 is fully accountable to the Commissioner of Education. The
731 office shall serve as a central repository for best practices,
732 training standards, and compliance oversight in all matters
733 regarding school safety and security, including prevention
734 efforts, intervention efforts, and emergency preparedness
735 planning. The office shall:
736 (1) Establish and update as necessary a school security
737 risk assessment tool for use by school districts pursuant to s.
738 1006.07(6). The office shall make the security risk assessment
739 tool available for use by charter schools. The office shall
740 provide annual training to appropriate school district and
741 charter school personnel on the proper assessment of physical
Page 37 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
742 site security and completion of the school security risk
743 assessment tool.
744 (4) Develop and implement a School Safety Specialist
745 Training Program for school safety specialists appointed
746 pursuant to s. 1006.07(6). The office shall develop the training
747 program which shall be based on national and state best
748 practices on school safety and security and must include active
749 shooter training. The office shall develop training modules in
750 traditional or online formats. A school safety specialist
751 certificate of completion shall be awarded to a school safety
752 specialist who satisfactorily completes the training required by
753 rules of the office.
754 (10) Disseminate, in consultation with the Department of
755 Law Enforcement, to participating schools awareness and
756 education materials on the proper use of the School Safety
757 Awareness Program developed pursuant to s. 943.082, including
758 the consequences of knowingly submitting false information.
759 Section 12. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
760 made by this act to section 30.15, Florida Statutes, in a
761 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (3), paragraph
762 (a) of subsection (4), and subsection (7) of section 1006.12,
763 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read:
764 1006.12 Safe-school officers at each public school.—For
765 the protection and safety of school personnel, property,
766 students, and visitors, each district school board and school
Page 38 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
767 district superintendent shall partner with law enforcement
768 agencies or security agencies to establish or assign one or more
769 safe-school officers at each school facility within the
770 district, including charter schools. A district school board
771 must collaborate with charter school governing boards to
772 facilitate charter school access to all safe-school officer
773 options available under this section. The school district may
774 implement any combination of the options in subsections (1)-(4)
775 to best meet the needs of the school district and charter
776 schools.
777 (3) SCHOOL GUARDIAN.—
778 (a) At the school district's or the charter school
779 governing board's discretion, as applicable, pursuant to s.
780 30.15, a school district or charter school governing board may
781 participate in the Chris Hixon, Coach Aaron Feis, and Coach
782 Scott Beigel Guardian Program to meet the requirement of
783 establishing a safe-school officer. The following individuals
784 may serve as a school guardian, in support of school-sanctioned
785 activities for purposes of s. 790.115, upon satisfactory
786 completion of the requirements under s. 30.15(1)(k) and
787 certification by a sheriff:
788 1. A school district employee or personnel, as defined
789 under s. 1012.01, or a charter school employee, as provided
790 under s. 1002.33(12)(a), who volunteers to serve as a school
791 guardian in addition to his or her official job duties; or
Page 39 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
792 2. An employee of a school district or a charter school
793 who is hired for the specific purpose of serving as a school
794 guardian.
795 (4) SCHOOL SECURITY GUARD.—A school district or charter
796 school governing board may contract with a security agency as
797 defined in s. 493.6101(18) to employ as a school security guard
798 an individual who holds a Class "D" and Class "G" license
799 pursuant to chapter 493, provided the following training and
800 contractual conditions are met:
801 (a) An individual who serves as a school security guard,
802 for purposes of satisfying the requirements of this section,
803 must:
804 1. Demonstrate completion of 144 hours of required
805 training conducted by a sheriff pursuant to s. 30.15(1)(k)2.
806 2. Pass a psychological evaluation administered by a
807 psychologist licensed under chapter 490 and designated by the
808 Department of Law Enforcement and submit the results of the
809 evaluation to the sheriff's office and school district, charter
810 school governing board, or employing security agency, as
811 applicable. The Department of Law Enforcement is authorized to
812 provide the sheriff's office, school district, charter school
813 governing board, or employing security agency with mental health
814 and substance abuse data for compliance with this paragraph.
815 3. Submit to and pass an initial drug test and subsequent
816 random drug tests in accordance with the requirements of s.
Page 40 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
817 112.0455 and the sheriff's office, school district, charter
818 school governing board, or employing security agency, as
819 applicable.
820 4. Be approved to work as a school security guard by the
821 sheriff of each county in which the school security guard will
822 be assigned to a school before commencing work at any school in
823 that county. The sheriff's approval authorizes the security
824 agency to assign the school security guard to any school in the
825 county, and the sheriff's approval is not limited to any
826 particular school.
827 5. Successfully complete ongoing training, weapon
828 inspection, and firearm qualification conducted by a sheriff
829 pursuant to s. 30.15(1)(k)2.e. on at least an annual basis and
830 provide documentation to the sheriff's office, school district,
831 charter school governing board, or employing security agency, as
832 applicable.
833 (7) LIMITATIONS.—An individual must satisfy the background
834 screening, psychological evaluation, and drug test requirements
835 and be approved by the sheriff before participating in any
836 training required by s. 30.15(1)(k), which may be conducted only
837 by a sheriff.
838
839 If a district school board, through its adopted policies,
840 procedures, or actions, denies a charter school access to any
841 safe-school officer options pursuant to this section, the school
Page 41 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 757, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
842 district must assign a school resource officer or school safety
843 officer to the charter school. Under such circumstances, the
844 charter school's share of the costs of the school resource
845 officer or school safety officer may not exceed the safe school
846 allocation funds provided to the charter school pursuant to s.
847 1011.62(12) and shall be retained by the school district.
848 Section 13. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
849 act, this act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 42 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb757 -04-er